Utah statutes.
17B-1-608.   Tentative budget and data -- Public records.

The tentative budget adopted by the board of trustees and all supporting schedules and data are public records, and are available for public inspection for a period of at least seven days prior to the adoption of a final budget.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

